Illinois, session 104th, HB5101.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Judicial Districts Act of 2021 is amended 5by changing Section 5 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 23/5)7    Sec. 5. Legislative intent. The intent of this Act is to 8redraw the Judicial Districts to meet the requirements of the 9Illinois Constitution of 1970 by providing that outside of the 10First District the State "shall be divided by law into four 11Judicial Districts of substantially equal population, each of 12which shall be compact and composed of contiguous counties."13    Section 2 of Article VI of the Illinois Constitution of 141970 divides the State into five Judicial Districts for the 15selection of Supreme and Appellate Court Judges, with Cook 16County comprising the First District and the remainder of the 17State "divided by law into four Judicial Districts of 18substantially equal population, each of which shall be compact 19and composed of contiguous counties." Further, Section 7 of 20Article VI provides that a Judicial Circuit must be located 21within one Judicial District, and also provides the First 22Judicial District is comprised of a judicial circuit and the 23remainder provided by law, subject to the requirement that   HB5101- 2 -LRB104 19935 JRC 33385 b1Circuits composed of more than one county shall be compact and 2of contiguous counties. The current Judicial District map was 3enacted in 1963.4    The current Judicial Districts do not meet the 5Constitution's requirement that four Districts other than the 6First District be of "substantially equal population." Using 7the American Community Survey data available at the time this 8Act is enacted, the population of the current First District 9is 5,198,212; the Second District is 3,204,960; the Third 10District is 1,782,863; the Fourth District is 1,299,747; and 11the Fifth District is 1,284,757.12    Under this redistricting plan, the population, according 13to the American Community Survey, of the Second District will 14be 1,770,983; the Third District will be 1,950,349; the Fourth 15District will be 2,011,316; and the Fifth District will be 161,839,679. A similar substantially equitable result occurs 17using the 2010 U.S. Census data, the most recent decennial 18census data available at the time of this Act, with the 19population of the Second District being approximately 201,747,387; the Third District being 1,936,616; the Fourth 21District being 2,069,660; and the Fifth District being 221,882,294. Because of the constitutional requirement that a 23District be composed of whole counties, and given that actual 24population changes on a day-to-day basis, the populations are 25not and could never be exact, but the population of each of the 26four Districts created by this Act is substantially equal.  HB5101- 3 -LRB104 19935 JRC 33385 b1    In addition to ensuring the population of the four 2Districts are substantially equal, this Act complies with 3Section 7 of Article VI of the Illinois Constitution of 1970, 4which provides that the First Judicial District shall be 5comprised of a Judicial Circuit, and the remaining Judicial 6Circuits shall be provided by law, and Circuits comprised of 7more than one county shall be compact and of contiguous 8counties. To comply with Section 7 of Article VI and minimize 9disruption to the administration of the Judicial Branch, this 10Act avoids changing the compositions and boundaries of the 11Judicial Circuits, while simultaneously creating substantially 12equally populated, compact, and contiguous Judicial Districts.13    To further avoid any interruption to the administration of 14the Judicial Branch, this Act does not require that the 15Supreme Court change where the Appellate Courts currently 16reside. By Supreme Court Rule, the Second District Appellate 17Court currently sits in Elgin; the Third District Appellate 18Court currently sits in Ottawa; the Fourth District Appellate 19Court currently sits in Springfield; and the Fifth District 20Appellate Court currently sits in Mt. Vernon. Under this Act, 21the Supreme Court is not required to change where the 22Appellate Courts sit as those cities remain in the Second, 23Third, Fourth, and Fifth District respectively.24    To ensure continuity of service and compliance with the 25Illinois Constitution of 1970, nothing in this Act is intended 26to affect the tenure of any Appellate or Supreme Court Judge   HB5101- 4 -LRB104 19935 JRC 33385 b1elected or appointed prior to the effective date of this Act. 2In accordance with the Constitution, no change in the 3boundaries shall affect an incumbent judge's qualification for 4office or right to run for retention. Incumbent judges have 5the right to run for retention in the counties comprising the 6District that elected the judge, or in the counties comprising 7the new District where the judge resides, as the judge may 8elect. As provided by the Constitution, upon a vacancy in an 9elected Supreme or Appellate Court office, the Supreme Court 10may fill the vacancy until the vacancy is filled in the next 11general election in the counties comprising the District 12created by this Act.13    Further, nothing in this Act is intended to alter or 14impair the ability of the Supreme Court to fulfill its 15obligations to ensure the proper administration of the 16Judicial Branch. For example, it remains within the purview of 17the Supreme Court to assign or reassign any judge to any court 18or determine assignment of additional judges to the Appellate 19Court. Section 1 of the Appellate Act provides that the 20"Supreme Court may assign additional judges to service in the 21Appellate Court from time to time as the business of the 22Appellate Court requires." Currently the Supreme Court has 23three judges on assignment to the Second District Appellate 24Court, whereas one judge is on assignment to the Third, 25Fourth, and Fifth Districts. Nothing in this Act seeks to 26alter any judicial assignments.  HB5101- 5 -LRB104 19935 JRC 33385 b1    Finally, it is the intent of the General Assembly that any 2appealable order, as defined by Supreme Court Rules, entered 3prior to the effective date of this Act shall be subject to 4judicial review by the Judicial District in effect on the date 5the order was entered; however, the administrative and 6supervisory authority of the courts remains within the purview 7of the Supreme Court.8(Source: P.A. 102-11, eff. 6-4-21; 102-687, eff. 12-17-21.) 9    Section 10. The Judicial Vacancies Act is amended by 10adding Section 5 as follows: 11    (705 ILCS 40/5 new)12    Sec. 5. Supreme Court vacancy. If a vacancy occurs in the 13Supreme Court, an appointment be made as provided in this 14Section to fill that vacancy for the remainder of that 15justice's term of office.16    (a) A judicial nomination commission is created to be 17comprised of the following members:18        (1) one nonlawyer appointed by the Governor who will 19    serve as chair of the commission;20        (2) one nonlawyer appointed by the President of the 21    Senate;22        (3) one nonlawyer appointed by the Minority Leader of 23    the Senate;24        (4) one nonlawyer appointed by the Speaker of the   HB5101- 6 -LRB104 19935 JRC 33385 b1    House;2        (5) one nonlawyer appointed by the Minority Leader of 3    the House;4        (6) one nonlawyer appointed by the Attorney General; 5    and6        (7) five lawyers to elected by secret ballot by the 7    members of the Chicago Bar Association, DuPage County Bar 8    Association, Illinois State Bar Association, Kane County 9    Bar Association, Lake County Bar Association, and Will 10    County Bar Association.11    (b) The judicial nomination commission must review, 12investigate, and submit to the Governor 3 nominations to fill 13each vacancy. The Governor must appoint one of the 3 who were 14nominated to fill that vacancy for the remainder of the 15vacating justice's term.16    (c) Any vacancy must be filled by a member of the same 17political party as the vacating justice's political party.18    (d) The Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts must 19supervise the election of the lawyer members to ensure that a 20lawyer may only vote once in the election of commission 21members.22    (e) An applicant may not be nominated or appointed unless 23the applicant meets all of the legal requirements to serve as a 24Supreme Court Justice.